Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.300

Investment of funds, including funds received by ESD—Authority—Procedure.

Any common school district board of directors is empowered to direct and authorize, and to delegate authority to an employee, officer, or agent of the common school district or the educational service district to direct and authorize, the county treasurer to invest funds described in RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320 and funds from state and federal sources as are then or thereafter received by the educational service district, and such funds from county sources as are then or thereafter received by the county treasurer, for distribution to the common school districts. Funds from state, county and federal sources which are so invested may be invested only for the period the funds are not required for the immediate necessities of the common school district as determined by the school district board of directors or its delegatee, and shall be invested in behalf of the common school district pursuant to the terms of RCW 28A.320.310, 28A.320.320, 36.29.020, 36.29.022, or 36.29.024 as the nature of the funds shall dictate. A grant of authority by a common school district pursuant to this section shall be by resolution of the board of directors and shall specify the duration and extent of the authority so granted. Any authority delegated to an educational service district pursuant to this section may be redelegated pursuant to RCW 28A.310.220.

[ 1999 c 18 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 335; 1982 c 191 s 5; 1975 c 47 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.430.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.335.210.

Transportation vehicle fund—Deposits in—Use—Rules for establishment and use: RCW 28A.160.130.